Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1557
Actions in which exemptions limited or not allowed.

Nothing in this chapter shall be so construed as to exempt any property in this state from execution or attachment for unpaid wages; for money due and owing by an attorney at law for money or other valuable consideration received by such attorney for any person or persons; or for enforcement of an award of or judgment for child support, alimony, or maintenance or a judgment for property division awarded to a former spouse.

R.S.1867, Code § 531, p. 486;

Laws 1869, § 1, p. 66;

Laws 1887, c. 95, § 1, p. 649;

R.S.1913, § 8104;

C.S.1922, § 9040;

C.S.1929, § 20-1558;

R.S.1943, § 25-1557;

Laws 1977, LB 60, § 3;

Laws 1997, LB 372, § 3.

Judgment need not disclose nature of claim. Shreck v. Gilbert, 52 Neb. 813, 73 N.W. 276 (1897).

This section is not applicable to property exempt by homestead laws. Money due independent contractor is not "wages." Fox v. McClay, 48 Neb. 820, 67 N.W. 888 (1896).

Money due contractor furnishing his own and other labor is not exempt as wages. Henderson v. Nott, 36 Neb. 154, 54 N.W. 87 (1893).

"Necessaries of life" do not include goods furnished boarding house. Lehnoff v. Fisher, 32 Neb. 107, 48 N.W. 821 (1891).

Laborers' wages were exempt. Snyder v. Brune, 22 Neb. 189, 34 N.W. 364 (1887).

Proviso in this section does not limit value of specific property exemption under preceding section. Clay Center Bank v. McKelvie, 19 F.2d 308 (8th Cir. 1927).